noun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Indf +Poss +1P +2P +3P +Arb +F

LEXICON Root
N;
NounPrefix;

LEXICON NounPrefix

+Neg:naa^ N;
+Neg:by^ N;‌
+Posv:baa^ N;
+Posv:por^ N; 

LEXICON NInf

+N+Sg:0 #;

!Noun Plurals

+N+Pl:^haa #;
+N+Pl:^aan #;
+N+Arb+F+Pl:^aat #;
+N+Arb+Pl:^yn #;
+N+Pl+Indf:^haayy #;
+N+Pl+Indf:^aany #;

!Indefinite marker
+N+Indf:^y #;

!Nominal Enclitics

+N+Poss+1P+Sg:^m #;
+N+Poss+2P+Sg:^t #;
+N+Poss+3P+Sg:^sh #;
+N+Poss+1P+Pl:^maan #;
+N+Poss+2P+Pl:^taan #;
+N+Poss+3P+Pl:^shaan #;

+N+Pl+Poss+1P+Sg:^haaym #;
+N+Pl+Poss+2P+Sg:^haayt #;
+N+Pl+Poss+3P+Sg:^haaysh #;
+N+Pl+Poss+2P+Pl:^haaytaan #;
+N+Pl+Poss+3P+Pl:^haayshaan #;



LEXICON N

!Irregular Plurals
ktaab+N+Pl:ktb #; !Books
wqt+N+Pl:awqaat #; !Times
ţrf+N+Pl:atraaf #; !Directions, Sides
shxs+N+Pl:ashxaas #; !Persons
mqdmh+N+Pl:mqdmaat #; !Preliminaries
'lm+N+Pl:'lwm #; !Sciences
wzyr+N+Pl:wzraa #; !Ministers
lqt+N+Pl:lqaat #; !Words
sha'r+N+Pl:sh'raa #; !Poets
'rab+N+Pl:a'raab #; !Arabs


!Regular Nouns

prndh   NInf;
grbh    NInf;
dftr    NInf;
dst		NInf;
dyvaar	NInf;
sbzh	NInf;
mxzn	NInf;
sfynh	NInf;
bykaar	NInf;
mbl		NInf;
staarh  NInf;
kaar	NInf;
rftgr	NInf;
xwshh	NInf;
baaftny NInf;
dyg		NInf;
baank	NInf;
maashyn NInf;
shkst	NInf;
rftaar  NInf;
kaart	NInf;
m'llm	NInf;
ktaab	NInf;
rvndh	NInf;
xwb		NInf;
mrd		NInf;
